Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.135.020

Grants—Eligibility—Grant period.

The institution of higher education shall be eligible to receive the grant for a period not exceeding two years. After the expiration of any two-year grant, the institution may reapply to receive subsequent grant awards or a continuation of the grant awarded the prior two years.

[ 1999 c 375 s 2.]